Missouri, session 2026, SB841.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 96.192, 96.196, 167.627, 167.630,
190.098, 190.246, 191.1146, 195.417, 196.990, 198.022, 198.070,
206.110, 208.662, 321.621, 332.081, 334.108, 335.081, 338.010,
338.333, 338.710, and 579.060, RSMo, are repealed and thirty-
seven new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 9.412, 9.418, 96.192, 96.196, 167.627, 167.630,
190.098, 190.246, 191.708, 191.1146, 192.021, 195.417, 196.990,
197.708, 198.022, 198.070, 206.110, 206.158, 208.149, 208.662,
208.1400, 208.1405, 208.1410, 208.1415, 208.1420, 208.1425,
210.225, 321.621, 332.081, 334.108, 335.081, 338.010, 338.333,
338.710, 376.1245, 376.1280, and 579.060, to read as follows:
9.412. The month of September each year is hereby
designated as "Brain Aneurysm Awareness Month" in Missouri.
The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
appropriate events and activities to raise awareness about
the causes of and treatments for brain aneurysms, which
affect nearly two hundred thousand people each year.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS SB 841 2
9.418. The last full week of April each year shall be
known as "Infertility Awareness Week" in Missouri.
Infertility is a medical condition defined by the inability
to achieve pregnancy after twelve months or more of regular,
unprotected sexual activity, or the inability to carry a
pregnancy to live birth, affecting millions of individuals
and couples worldwide. It is estimated that approximately
one in eight couples in the United States experience
infertility, impacting people across all racial, ethnic,
socioeconomic, and cultural backgrounds. The citizens of
this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to raise awareness about infertility
to help reduce stigma, foster understanding, and promote
equitable access to fertility treatments and family-building
options, including assisted reproductive technologies,
adoption, and surrogacy.
96.192. 1. The board of trustees of any hospital
authorized under subsection 2 of this section, and
established and organized under the provisions of sections
96.150 to 96.229[,]:
(1) May invest up to [twenty-five] fifty percent of
the hospital's "available funds", defined in this section as
funds not required for immediate disbursement in obligations
or for the operation of the hospital [in any United States
investment grade fixed income funds or any diversified stock
funds, or both.], into:
(a) Any mutual funds that invest in stocks, bonds, or
real estate, or any combination thereof;
(b) Bonds that have:
a. One of the five highest long-term ratings or the
highest short-term rating issued by a nationally recognized
rating agency; and

SCS SB 841 3
b. A final maturity of ten years or less;
(c) Money market investments; or
(d) Any combination of investments described in
paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subdivision; and
(2) Shall invest the remaining percentage of any
available funds not invested as allowed under subdivision
(1) of this subsection into any investment in which the
state treasurer is allowed to invest.
2. The provisions of this section shall only apply if
the hospital:
(1) Receives less than [one] three percent of its
annual revenues from municipal, county, or state taxes; and
(2) Receives less than [one] three percent of its
annual revenue from appropriated funds from the municipality
in which such hospital is located.
96.196. 1. A hospital organized under this chapter
may purchase, operate or lease, as lessor or lessee, related
facilities or engage in health care activities, except in
counties of the third or fourth classification (other than
the county in which the hospital is located) where there
already exists a hospital organized pursuant to this chapter
[and chapter 205 or 206]; provided, however, that this
exception shall not prohibit the continuation of existing
activities otherwise allowed by law.
2. If a hospital organized pursuant to this chapter
accepts appropriated funds from the city during the twelve
months immediately preceding the date that the hospital
purchases, operates or leases its first related facility
outside the city boundaries or engages in its first health
care activity outside the city boundaries, the governing
body of the city shall approve the hospital's plan for such

SCS SB 841 4
purchase, operation or lease prior to implementation of the
plan.
167.627. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Epinephrine delivery device", a single-use device
used for the delivery of a premeasured dose of epinephrine
into the human body;
(2) "Medication", any medicine prescribed or ordered
by a physician for the treatment of asthma or anaphylaxis,
including without limitation inhaled bronchodilators and
[auto-injectible] epinephrine delivery devices;
[(2)] (3) "Self-administration", a pupil's
discretionary use of medication prescribed by a physician or
under a written treatment plan from a physician.
2. Each board of education and its employees and
agents in this state shall grant any pupil in the school
authorization for the possession and self-administration of
medication to treat such pupil's chronic health condition,
including but not limited to asthma or anaphylaxis if:
(1) A licensed physician prescribed or ordered such
medication for use by the pupil and instructed such pupil in
the correct and responsible use of such medication;
(2) The pupil has demonstrated to the pupil's licensed
physician or the licensed physician's designee, and the
school nurse, if available, the skill level necessary to use
the medication and any device necessary to administer such
medication prescribed or ordered;
(3) The pupil's physician has approved and signed a
written treatment plan for managing the pupil's chronic
health condition, including asthma or anaphylaxis episodes
and for medication for use by the pupil. Such plan shall

SCS SB 841 5
include a statement that the pupil is capable of self-
administering the medication under the treatment plan;
(4) The pupil's parent or guardian has completed and
submitted to the school any written documentation required
by the school, including the treatment plan required under
subdivision (3) of this subsection and the liability
statement required under subdivision (5) of this subsection;
and
(5) The pupil's parent or guardian has signed a
statement acknowledging that the school district and its
employees or agents shall incur no liability as a result of
any injury arising from the self-administration of
medication by the pupil or the administration of such
medication by school staff. Such statement shall not be
construed to release the school district and its employees
or agents from liability for negligence.
3. An authorization granted under subsection 2 of this
section shall:
(1) Permit such pupil to possess and self-administer
such pupil's medication while in school, at a school-
sponsored activity, and in transit to or from school or
school-sponsored activity; and
(2) Be effective only for the same school and school
year for which it is granted. Such authorization shall be
renewed by the pupil's parent or guardian each subsequent
school year in accordance with this section.
4. Any current duplicate prescription medication, if
provided by a pupil's parent or guardian or by the school,
shall be kept at a pupil's school in a location at which the
pupil or school staff has immediate access in the event of
an asthma or anaphylaxis emergency.

SCS SB 841 6
5. The information described in subdivisions (3) and
(4) of subsection 2 of this section shall be kept on file at
the pupil's school in a location easily accessible in the
event of an emergency.
167.630. 1. As used in this section, the term
"epinephrine delivery device" has the same meaning given to
the term in section 167.627.
2. Each school board may authorize a school nurse
licensed under chapter 335 who is employed by the school
district and for whom the board is responsible for to
maintain an adequate supply of [prefilled auto syringes of]
epinephrine [with fifteen-hundredths milligram or three-
tenths milligram] delivery devices at the school. The nurse
shall recommend to the school board the number of
[prefilled] epinephrine [auto syringes] delivery devices
that the school should maintain.
[2.] 3. To obtain [prefilled] epinephrine [auto
syringes] delivery devices for a school district, a
prescription written by a licensed physician, a physician's
assistant, or nurse practitioner is required. For such
prescriptions, the school district shall be designated as
the patient, the nurse's name shall be required, and the
prescription shall be filled at a licensed pharmacy.
[3.] 4. A school nurse, contracted agent trained by a
nurse, or other school employee trained by and supervised by
the nurse shall have the discretion to use an epinephrine
[auto syringe] delivery device on any student the school
nurse, trained employee, or trained contracted agent
believes is having a life-threatening anaphylactic reaction
based on the training in recognizing an acute episode of an
anaphylactic reaction. The provisions of section 167.624
concerning immunity from civil liability for trained

SCS SB 841 7
employees administering lifesaving methods shall apply to
trained employees administering [a prefilled auto syringe]
an epinephrine delivery device under this section. Trained
contracted agents shall have immunity from civil liability
for administering [a prefilled auto syringe] an epinephrine
delivery device under this section.
190.098. 1. As used in this section, the term
"community paramedic services" means services that are:
(1) Provided by any entity that:
(a) Employs licensed paramedics who are certified as
community paramedics by the department; and
(b) Has received an endorsement by the department as a
community paramedic service entity;
(2) Provided in a nonemergent setting, independent of
a 911 system or emergency summons;
(3) Consistent with the training and education, as
well as within the scope of skill and practice, of the
personnel and with the supervisory standard approved by the
medical director; and
(4) Reflected and documented in the entity's patient
care plans or protocols approved by the medical director in
accordance with section 190.142.
2. In order for a person to be eligible for
certification by the department as a community paramedic, an
individual shall:
(1) Be currently [certified] licensed as a paramedic;
(2) Successfully complete or have successfully
completed a community paramedic certification program from a
college, university, or educational institution that has
been approved by the department or accredited by a national
accreditation organization approved by the department; and

SCS SB 841 8
(3) Complete an application form approved by the
department.
[2.] 3. A community paramedic shall practice in
accordance with protocols and supervisory standards
established by the medical director[. A community paramedic
shall provide services of a health care plan if the plan has
been developed by the patient's physician or by an advanced
practice registered nurse through a collaborative practice
arrangement with a physician or a physician assistant
through a collaborative practice arrangement with a
physician and there is no duplication of services to the
patient from another provider] in collaboration with the
ambulance service administrator. Patient care plans that
are developed by the patient's physician, advanced practice
nurse practitioner, or physician assistant shall be
implemented through a collaboration with the medical
director and agency.
[3.] 4. (1) Any ambulance service [shall enter into a
written contract to provide community paramedic services in
another ambulance service area, as that term is defined in
section 190.100. The contract that is agreed upon may be
for an indefinite period of time, as long as it includes at
least a sixty-day cancellation notice by either ambulance
service] that seeks to provide community paramedic services
outside of its ambulance service area, as described in
section 190.105 and administered by the department, and in
the service area of another ambulance service that currently
provides community paramedic services shall be required to
have a memorandum of understanding with that ambulance
service regarding the provision of such community paramedic
services. An ambulance service that provides community
paramedic services may provide community paramedic services

SCS SB 841 9
without a memorandum of understanding in the ambulance
service area of an ambulance service that is not providing
community paramedic services, but the ambulance service
providing community paramedic services shall provide
notification to the ambulance service with emergency service
responsibilities in the service area of the general
community paramedic activities being performed.
(2) An ambulance service that provides community
paramedic services and that has executed formal contracts or
agreements with health care institutions, hospitals, health
clinics, or insurance companies for the provision of
community paramedic services shall be permitted to honor
those agreements.
(3) For sustained services provided outside the county
of the ambulance services primary 911 response territory
where another licensed ambulance service also offers
community paramedic services, the community paramedic
program shall coordinate with the local ambulance service.
(4) Any emergency medical response agency seeking to
provide community paramedic services within its designated
response service area may do so if the ground ambulance
service covering the area within which the emergency medical
response agency is located does not provide community
paramedic services. If such ground ambulance service does
provide community paramedic services, the ground ambulance
service may establish, at its sole discretion, a memorandum
of understanding with the emergency medical response agency
planning to offer community paramedic services in order to
coordinate programs and avoid service duplication. If an
emergency medical response agency is providing community
paramedic services in a service area before the ground
ambulance service in that service area begins offering

SCS SB 841 10
community paramedic services, the emergency medical response
agency and the ground ambulance service shall establish a
memorandum of understanding for the coordination of services.
(5) A community paramedic program shall notify the
appropriate local ambulance service when providing services
within the service area of an ambulance service.
(6) The department shall establish regulations for the
purpose of recognizing community paramedic service entities
that have met the standards necessary to provide community
paramedic services, including physician medical oversight,
100 training, patient record keeping, formal relationships with
101 primary care services where necessary, and quality
102 improvement policies. The department shall issue an
103 endorsement to any community paramedic service entity that
104 meets such standards that allows the entity to provide
105 community paramedic services for a period of five years.
106 [4.] 5. A community paramedic is subject to the
107 provisions of sections 190.001 to 190.245 and rules
108 promulgated under sections 190.001 to 190.245.
109 [5.] 6. No person shall hold himself or herself out as
110 a community paramedic or provide the services of a community
111 paramedic unless such person is certified by the department.
112 [6.] 7. The medical director shall approve the
113 implementation of the community paramedic program.
114 [7.] 8. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
115 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
116 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
117 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
118 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
119 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
120 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
121 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective

SCS SB 841 11
122 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
123 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
124 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
125 2013, shall be invalid and void.
190.246. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Eligible person, firm, organization or other
entity", an ambulance service or emergency medical response
agency, an emergency medical responder, or an emergency
medical technician who is employed by, or an enrolled
member, person, firm, organization or entity designated by,
rule of the department of health and senior services in
consultation with other appropriate agencies. All such
eligible persons, firms, organizations or other entities
shall be subject to the rules promulgated by the director of
the department of health and senior services;
(2) "Emergency health care provider":
(a) A physician licensed pursuant to chapter 334 with
knowledge and experience in the delivery of emergency care;
or
(b) A hospital licensed pursuant to chapter 197 that
provides emergency care;
(3) "Epinephrine delivery device", a single-use device
used for the delivery of a premeasured dose of epinephrine
into the human body.
2. Possession and use of epinephrine [auto-injector]
delivery devices shall be limited as follows:
(1) No person shall use an epinephrine [auto-injector]
delivery device unless such person has successfully
completed a training course in the use of epinephrine [auto-
injector] delivery devices approved by the director of the
department of health and senior services. Nothing in this

SCS SB 841 12
section shall prohibit the use of an epinephrine [auto-
injector] delivery device:
(a) By a health care professional licensed or
certified by this state who is acting within the scope of
his or her practice; or
(b) By a person acting pursuant to a lawful
prescription;
(2) Every person, firm, organization and entity
authorized to possess and use epinephrine [auto-injector]
delivery devices pursuant to this section shall use,
maintain and dispose of such devices in accordance with the
rules of the department; and
(3) Every use of an epinephrine [auto-injector]
delivery device pursuant to this section shall immediately
be reported to the emergency health care provider.
3. (1) Use of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
device pursuant to this section shall be considered first
aid or emergency treatment for the purpose of any law
relating to liability.
(2) Purchase, acquisition, possession or use of an
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device pursuant to this
section shall not constitute the unlawful practice of
medicine or the unlawful practice of a profession.
(3) Any person otherwise authorized to sell or provide
an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device may sell or
provide it to a person authorized to possess it pursuant to
this section.
4. Any person, firm, organization or entity that
violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a class
B misdemeanor.
191.708. 1. The chief medical officer or chief
medical director of the department of health and senior

SCS SB 841 13
services, the department of mental health, or the MO
HealthNet division of the department of social services, or
any licensed physician acting with the express written
consent of the director of any such department or division,
may, within his or her scope of practice, issue:
(1) Nonspecific recommendations for doula services;
(2) A medical standing order for prenatal vitamins; or
(3) A medical standing order for any other purpose,
other than for controlled substances, that is promulgated by
rule in compliance with chapter 536.
2. Any standing order issued under this section shall:
(1) Be made available on the relevant department's
website while in effect;
(2) Terminate upon removal of the issuing medical
professional's authority under this section by vacancy of
his or her position or otherwise; and
(3) If not terminated sooner under subdivision (2) of
this subsection, expire within one year of issuance unless
renewed.
3. The chief medical officer, chief medical director,
or other authorized and licensed physician described in
subsection 1 of this section shall be immune from criminal
prosecution, disciplinary action from his or her
professional licensing board, and civil liability for
issuing a medical standing order or recommendation in
accordance with this section, including for any outcome
related to the standing order or recommendation.
191.1146. 1. Physicians licensed under chapter 334
who use telemedicine shall ensure that a properly
established physician-patient relationship exists with the
person who receives the telemedicine services. The
physician-patient relationship may be established by:

SCS SB 841 14
(1) An in-person encounter through a medical
[interview] evaluation and physical examination;
(2) Consultation with another physician, or that
physician's delegate, who has an established relationship
with the patient and an agreement with the physician to
participate in the patient's care; or
(3) A telemedicine encounter, if the standard of care
does not require an in-person encounter, and in accordance
with evidence-based standards of practice and telemedicine
practice guidelines that address the clinical and
technological aspects of telemedicine.
2. In order to establish a physician-patient
relationship through telemedicine:
(1) The technology utilized shall be sufficient to
establish an informed diagnosis as though the medical
[interview] evaluation and, if required to meet the standard
of care, the physical examination has been performed in
person; [and]
(2) Prior to providing treatment, including issuing
prescriptions or physician certifications under Article XIV
of the Missouri Constitution, a physician who uses
telemedicine shall [interview] evaluate the patient, collect
or review the patient's relevant medical history, and
perform an examination sufficient for the diagnosis and
treatment of the patient. [A] Any questionnaire completed
by the patient, whether via the internet or telephone, shall
be reviewed by the treating health care professional, as
defined in section 376.1350, and shall include such
information sufficient to provide the information as though
the medical evaluation has been performed in person,
otherwise such questionnaire does not constitute an

SCS SB 841 15
acceptable medical [interview] evaluation and examination
for the provision of treatment by telehealth; and
(3) Any provider that uses a questionnaire to
establish a physician-patient relationship through
telemedicine shall be employed or contracted with a business
entity that is licensed to provide health care in this state.
3. A health care provider, utilizing a medical
evaluation questionnaire completed by the patient by way of
the internet or telephone, shall provide a written report to
the patient's primary health care provider within fourteen
days of evaluation, if provided by the patient, that
contains:
(1) The identity of the patient;
(2) The date of the evaluation;
(3) The diagnosis and treatment provided, if any; and
(4) Any further instructions provided to the patient.
192.021. 1. The department of health and senior
services shall be authorized to contract directly with an
entity on a qualified vendor list composed of Missouri
affiliates of national public health associations or public
health institutes in order to assist in carrying out its
duties to promote the health and wellbeing of the residents
of this state. Such contracts may include, but not be
limited to, efforts to assist in the delivery of health
services to residents throughout the state and the
administration of grant funds and related programs.
2. Within sixty days after the end of each fiscal
year, the department and the designated affiliate shall
provide the general assembly with an annual report and
accounting of any appropriations and grant funds received
and expended by the designated affiliate pursuant to this
section during the immediate prior fiscal year and may

SCS SB 841 16
provide recommendations and suggestions for improvement in
services provided.
195.417. 1. The limits specified in this section
shall not apply to any quantity of such product, mixture, or
preparation which must be dispensed, sold, or distributed in
a pharmacy pursuant to a valid prescription.
2. Within any thirty-day period, no person shall sell,
dispense, or otherwise provide to the same individual, and
no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire more
than the following amount: any number of packages of any
drug product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers,
either as:
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination
drug; or
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection;
in any total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams,
without regard to the number of transactions.
3. Within any twenty-four-hour period, no pharmacist,
intern pharmacist, or registered pharmacy technician shall
sell, dispense, or otherwise provide to the same individual,
and no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire
more than the following amount: any number of packages of
any drug product containing any detectable amount of
ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any
of their salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical
isomers, either as:
(1) The sole active ingredient; or

SCS SB 841 17
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination
drug; or
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection;
in any total amount greater than three and six-tenths grams
without regard to the number of transactions.
4. Within any twelve-month period, no person shall
sell, dispense, or otherwise provide to the same individual,
and no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire
more than the following amount: any number of packages of
any drug product containing any detectable amount of
ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any
of their salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical
isomers, either as:
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination
drug; or
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection;
in any total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and
two-tenths grams, without regard to the number of
transactions.
5. All packages of any compound, mixture, or
preparation containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers,
except those that are excluded from Schedule V in subsection
17 or 18 of section 195.017, shall be offered for sale only
from behind a pharmacy counter where the public is not

SCS SB 841 18
permitted, and only by a registered pharmacist or registered
pharmacy technician under section 195.017.
6. Each pharmacy shall submit information regarding
sales of any compound, mixture, or preparation as specified
in this section in accordance with transmission methods and
frequency established by the department by regulation.
7. (1) As used in this subsection, "administrator of
the real-time electronic pseudoephedrine tracking system"
means the entity responsible for developing, implementing,
and maintaining the data collection system described in 19
CSR 30-1.074 or any successor regulation.
(2) Beginning October 1, 2026, and continuing
thereafter, any manufacturer of any compound, mixture, or
preparation specified in this section that is sold in or
into the state shall, on a monthly basis, pay fees to the
administrator of the real-time electronic pseudoephedrine
tracking system.
(3) The administrator of the real-time electronic
pseudoephedrine tracking system shall be responsible for
setting the fee levels required under this subsection.
(4) Upon the request of the department of health and
senior services, any manufacturer required to pay fees under
this subsection shall provide written documentation
demonstrating that the manufacturer has paid such fees.
8. No prescription shall be required for the
dispensation, sale, or distribution of any drug product
containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in an
amount within the limits described in subsections 2, 3, and
4 of this section. The superintendent of the Missouri state
highway patrol shall report to the revisor of statutes and

SCS SB 841 19
the general assembly by February first when the statewide
number of methamphetamine laboratory seizure incidents
exceeds three hundred incidents in the previous calendar
year. The provisions of this subsection shall expire on
April first of the calendar year in which the revisor of
statutes receives such notification.
[8.] 9. This section shall supersede and preempt any
local ordinances or regulations, including any ordinances or
regulations enacted by any political subdivision of the
100 state. This section shall not apply to the sale of any
101 animal feed products containing ephedrine or any naturally
102 occurring or herbal ephedra or extract of ephedra.
103 [9.] 10. Any local ordinances or regulations enacted
104 by any political subdivision of the state prior to August
105 28, 2020, requiring a prescription for the dispensation,
106 sale, or distribution of any drug product containing any
107 detectable amount of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or
108 pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or optical isomers,
109 or salts of optical isomers, in an amount within the limits
110 described in subsections 2, 3, and 4 of this section shall
111 be void and of no effect and no such political subdivision
112 shall maintain or enforce such ordinance or regulation.
113 [10.] 11. All logs, records, documents, and electronic
114 information maintained for the dispensing of these products
115 shall be open for inspection and copying by municipal,
116 county, and state or federal law enforcement officers whose
117 duty it is to enforce the controlled substances laws of this
118 state or the United States.
119 [11.] 12. All persons who dispense or offer for sale
120 pseudoephedrine and ephedrine products, except those that
121 are excluded from Schedule V in subsection 17 or 18 of
122 section 195.017, shall ensure that all such products are

SCS SB 841 20
123 located only behind a pharmacy counter where the public is
124 not permitted.
125 [12.] 13. The penalty for a knowing or reckless
126 violation of this section is found in section 579.060.
196.990. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Administer", the direct application of an
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device to the body of
an individual;
(2) "Authorized entity", any entity or organization at
or in connection with which allergens capable of causing
anaphylaxis may be present including, but not limited to,
qualified first responders, as such term is defined in
section 321.621, facilities licensed under chapter 198,
restaurants, recreation camps, youth sports leagues, child
care facilities, amusement parks, and sports arenas.
"Authorized entity" shall not include any public school or
public charter school;
(3) "Epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device", a
single-use device used for the [automatic injection]
delivery of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human
body;
(4) "Physician", a physician licensed in this state
under chapter 334;
(5) "Provide", the supply of one or more epinephrine
[auto-injectors] delivery devices to an individual;
(6) "Self-administration", a person's discretionary
use of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device.
2. A physician may prescribe epinephrine [auto-
injectors] delivery devices in the name of an authorized
entity for use in accordance with this section, and
pharmacists, physicians, and other persons authorized to

SCS SB 841 21
dispense prescription medications may dispense epinephrine
[auto-injectors] delivery devices under a prescription
issued in the name of an authorized entity.
3. An authorized entity may acquire and stock a supply
of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices under a
prescription issued in accordance with this section. Such
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices shall be
stored in a location readily accessible in an emergency and
in accordance with the epinephrine [auto-injector's]
delivery device's instructions for use and any additional
requirements established by the department of health and
senior services by rule. An authorized entity shall
designate employees or agents who have completed the
training required under this section to be responsible for
the storage, maintenance, and general oversight of
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices acquired by
the authorized entity.
4. An authorized entity that acquires a supply of
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices under a
prescription issued in accordance with this section shall
ensure that:
(1) Expected epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
device users receive training in recognizing symptoms of
severe allergic reactions including anaphylaxis and the use
of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices from a
nationally recognized organization experienced in training
laypersons in emergency health treatment or another entity
or person approved by the department of health and senior
services;
(2) All epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices
are maintained and stored according to the epinephrine [auto-
injector's] delivery device's instructions for use;

SCS SB 841 22
(3) Any person who provides or administers an
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device to an individual
who the person believes in good faith is experiencing
anaphylaxis activates the emergency medical services system
as soon as possible; and
(4) A proper review of all situations in which an
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device is used to
render emergency care is conducted.
5. Any authorized entity that acquires a supply of
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices under a
prescription issued in accordance with this section shall
notify the emergency communications district or the
ambulance dispatch center of the primary provider of
emergency medical services where the epinephrine [auto-
injectors] delivery devices are to be located within the
entity's facility.
6. No person shall provide or administer an
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device to any
individual who is under eighteen years of age without the
verbal consent of a parent or guardian who is present at the
time when provision or administration of the epinephrine
[auto-injector] delivery device is needed. Provided,
however, that a person may provide or administer an
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device to such an
individual without the consent of a parent or guardian if
the parent or guardian is not physically present and the
person reasonably believes the individual shall be in
imminent danger without the provision or administration of
the epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device.
7. The following persons and entities shall not be
liable for any injuries or related damages that result from
the administration or self-administration of an epinephrine

SCS SB 841 23
[auto-injector] delivery device in accordance with this
section that may constitute ordinary negligence:
(1) An authorized entity that possesses and makes
available epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices and
its employees, agents, and other trained persons;
(2) Any person who uses an epinephrine [auto-injector]
delivery device made available under this section;
100 (3) A physician that prescribes epinephrine [auto-
101 injectors] delivery devices to an authorized entity; or
102 (4) Any person or entity that conducts the training
103 described in this section.
104 Such immunity does not apply to acts or omissions
105 constituting a reckless disregard for the safety of others
106 or willful or wanton conduct. The administration of an
107 epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device in accordance
108 with this section shall not be considered the practice of
109 medicine. The immunity from liability provided under this
110 subsection is in addition to and not in lieu of that
111 provided under section 537.037. An authorized entity
112 located in this state shall not be liable for any injuries
113 or related damages that result from the provision or
114 administration of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
115 device by its employees or agents outside of this state if
116 the entity or its employee or agent is not liable for such
117 injuries or related damages under the laws of the state in
118 which such provision or administration occurred. No trained
119 person who is in compliance with this section and who in
120 good faith and exercising reasonable care fails to
121 administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device
122 shall be liable for such failure.

SCS SB 841 24
123 8. All basic life support ambulances and stretcher
124 vans operated in the state shall be equipped with
125 epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices and be staffed
126 by at least one individual trained in the use of epinephrine
127 [auto-injectors] delivery devices.
128 9. The provisions of this section shall apply in all
129 counties within the state and any city not within a county.
130 10. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
131 superseding the provisions of section 167.630.
197.708. Each hospital shall display in a prominent
place within the waiting rooms of the emergency department
and the labor and delivery department a printed sign with
the following text in all capital letters: "WARNING:
ASSAULTING A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL WHO IS ENGAGED IN THE
PERFORMANCE OF HIS OR HER OFFICIAL DUTIES, INCLUDING
STRIKING A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL WITH ANY BODILY FLUID,
IS A SERIOUS CRIME AND WILL BE PROSECUTED TO THE FULLEST
EXTENT OF THE LAW.".
198.022. 1. Upon receipt of an application for a
license to operate a facility, the department shall review
the application, investigate the applicant and the
statements sworn to in the application for license and
conduct any necessary inspections. A license shall be
issued if the following requirements are met:
(1) The statements in the application are true and
correct;
(2) The facility and the operator are in substantial
compliance with the provisions of sections 198.003 to
198.096 and the standards established thereunder;
(3) The applicant has the financial capacity to
operate the facility;

SCS SB 841 25
(4) The administrator of an assisted living facility,
a skilled nursing facility, or an intermediate care facility
is currently licensed under the provisions of chapter 344;
(5) Neither the operator nor any principals in the
operation of the facility have ever been convicted of a
felony offense concerning the operation of a long-term
health care facility or other health care facility or ever
knowingly acted or knowingly failed to perform any duty
which materially and adversely affected the health, safety,
welfare or property of a resident, while acting in a
management capacity. The operator of the facility or any
principal in the operation of the facility shall not be
under exclusion from participation in the Title XVIII
(Medicare) or Title XIX (Medicaid) program of any state or
territory;
(6) Neither the operator nor any principals involved
in the operation of the facility have ever been convicted of
a felony in any state or federal court arising out of
conduct involving either management of a long-term care
facility or the provision or receipt of health care;
(7) All fees due to the state have been paid.
2. Upon denial of any application for a license, the
department shall so notify the applicant in writing, setting
forth therein the reasons and grounds for denial.
3. The department may inspect any facility and any
records and may make copies of records, at the facility, at
the department's own expense, required to be maintained by
sections 198.003 to 198.096 or by the rules and regulations
promulgated thereunder at any time if a license has been
issued to or an application for a license has been filed by
the operator of such facility. Copies of any records
requested by the department shall be prepared by the staff

SCS SB 841 26
of such facility within two business days or as determined
by the department. The department shall not remove or
disassemble any medical record during any inspection of the
facility, but may observe the photocopying or may make its
own copies if the facility does not have the technology to
make the copies. In accordance with the provisions of
section 198.525, the department shall make at least one
inspection per year, which shall be unannounced to the
operator. The department may make such other inspections,
announced or unannounced, as it deems necessary to carry out
the provisions of sections 198.003 to 198.136.
4. Whenever the department has reasonable grounds to
believe that a facility required to be licensed under
sections 198.003 to 198.096 is operating without a license,
and the department is not permitted access to inspect the
facility, or when a licensed operator refuses to permit
access to the department to inspect the facility, the
department shall apply to the circuit court of the county in
which the premises is located for an order authorizing entry
for such inspection, and the court shall issue the order if
it finds reasonable grounds for inspection or if it finds
that a licensed operator has refused to permit the
department access to inspect the facility.
5. Whenever the department is inspecting a facility in
response to an application from an operator located outside
of Missouri not previously licensed by the department, the
department may request from the applicant the past five
years compliance history of all facilities owned by the
applicant located outside of this state.
6. (1) In lieu of any inspection required by sections
198.003 to 198.186, the department may accept, in whole or
in part, written reports of the survey of any state or

SCS SB 841 27
federal agency, or of any professional accrediting agency,
if such survey is:
(a) Comparable in scope and method to the department's
surveys; and
(b) Conducted in accordance with Title XVIII of the
Social Security Act.
(2) Failure by a residential care facility or assisted
living facility to maintain an accredited status by a
recognized accrediting entity shall result in the assisted
living facility or residential care facility being subject
to an inspection pursuant to section 198.525.
(3) The residential care facility or the assisted
living facility shall provide to the department the
accreditation report verifying accreditation status to be
published on the department's website and made publicly
available pursuant to section 198.030.
(4) The residential care facility or the assisted
living facility shall immediately forward any complaint or
report of suspected abuse or neglect that is reported to the
accrediting entity to the department in the same manner as
provided under section 198.070.
198.070. 1. When any adult day care worker;
chiropractor; Christian Science practitioner; coroner;
dentist; embalmer; employee of the departments of social
services, mental health, or health and senior services;
employee of a local area agency on aging or an organized
area agency on aging program; funeral director; home health
agency or home health agency employee; hospital and clinic
personnel engaged in examination, care, or treatment of
persons; in-home services owner, provider, operator, or
employee; law enforcement officer; long-term care facility
administrator or employee; medical examiner; medical

SCS SB 841 28
resident or intern; mental health professional; minister;
nurse; nurse practitioner; optometrist; other health
practitioner; peace officer; pharmacist; physical therapist;
physician; physician's assistant; podiatrist; probation or
parole officer; psychologist; social worker; or other person
with the care of a person sixty years of age or older or an
eligible adult, as defined in section 192.2400, has
reasonable cause to believe that a resident of a facility
has been abused or neglected, he or she shall immediately
report or cause a report to be made to the department.
2. (1) The report shall contain the name and address
of the facility, the name of the resident, information
regarding the nature of the abuse or neglect, the name of
the complainant, and any other information which might be
helpful in an investigation.
(2) In the event of suspected sexual assault of the
resident, in addition to the report to be made to the
department, a report shall be made to the appropriate local
law enforcement agency in accordance with federal law under
the provisions of 42 U.S.C. Section 1320b-25.
3. Any person required in subsection 1 of this section
to report or cause a report to be made to the department who
knowingly fails to make a report within a reasonable time
after the act of abuse or neglect as required in this
subsection is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
4. In addition to the penalties imposed by this
section, any administrator who knowingly conceals any act of
abuse or neglect resulting in death or serious physical
injury, as defined in section 556.061, is guilty of a class
E felony.
5. In addition to those persons required to report
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, any other person

SCS SB 841 29
having reasonable cause to believe that a resident has been
abused or neglected may report such information to the
department.
6. Upon receipt of a report, the department shall
initiate an investigation within twenty-four hours and, as
soon as possible during the course of the investigation,
shall notify the resident's next of kin or responsible party
of the report and the investigation and further notify them
whether the report was substantiated or unsubstantiated
unless such person is the alleged perpetrator of the abuse
or neglect. As provided in section 192.2425, substantiated
reports of elder abuse shall be promptly reported by the
department to the appropriate law enforcement agency and
prosecutor.
7. If the investigation indicates possible abuse or
neglect of a resident, the investigator shall refer the
complaint together with the investigator's report to the
department director or the director's designee for
appropriate action. If, during the investigation or at its
completion, the department has reasonable cause to believe
that immediate removal is necessary to protect the resident
from abuse or neglect, the department or the local
prosecuting attorney may, or the attorney general upon
request of the department shall, file a petition for
temporary care and protection of the resident in a circuit
court of competent jurisdiction. The circuit court in which
the petition is filed shall have equitable jurisdiction to
issue an ex parte order granting the department authority
for the temporary care and protection of the resident, for a
period not to exceed thirty days.
8. Reports shall be confidential, as provided pursuant
to section 192.2500.

SCS SB 841 30
9. Anyone, except any person who has abused or
neglected a resident in a facility, who makes a report
pursuant to this section or who testifies in any
administrative or judicial proceeding arising from the
report shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability
for making such a report or for testifying except for
liability for perjury, unless such person acted negligently,
recklessly, in bad faith or with malicious purpose. It is a
crime under section 565.189 for any person to knowingly file
a false report of elder abuse or neglect.
10. Within five working days after a report required
to be made pursuant to this section is received, the person
making the report shall be notified in writing of its
receipt and of the initiation of the investigation.
11. No person who directs or exercises any authority
in a facility shall evict, harass, dismiss or retaliate
against a resident or employee because such resident or
employee or any member of such resident's or employee's
family has made a report of any violation or suspected
violation of laws, ordinances or regulations applying to the
facility which the resident, the resident's family or an
employee has reasonable cause to believe has been committed
or has occurred. Through the existing department
information and referral telephone contact line, residents,
100 their families and employees of a facility shall be able to
101 obtain information about their rights, protections and
102 options in cases of eviction, harassment, dismissal or
103 retaliation due to a report being made pursuant to this
104 section.
105 12. Any person who abuses or neglects a resident of a
106 facility is subject to criminal prosecution under section
107 565.184.

SCS SB 841 31
108 13. The department shall maintain the employee
109 disqualification list and place on the employee
110 disqualification list the names of any persons who are or
111 have been employed in any facility and who have been finally
112 determined by the department pursuant to section 192.2490 to
113 have knowingly or recklessly abused or neglected a
114 resident. For purposes of this section only, "knowingly"
115 and "recklessly" shall have the meanings that are ascribed
116 to them in this section. A person acts "knowingly" with
117 respect to the person's conduct when a reasonable person
118 should be aware of the result caused by his or her conduct.
119 A person acts "recklessly" when the person consciously
120 disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the
121 person's conduct will result in serious physical injury and
122 such disregard constitutes a gross deviation from the
123 standard of care that a reasonable person would exercise in
124 the situation.
125 14. The timely self-reporting of incidents to the
126 central registry by a facility shall continue to be
127 investigated in accordance with department policy, and shall
128 not be counted or reported by the department as a hot-line
129 call but rather a self-reported incident. If the self-
130 reported incident results in a regulatory violation, such
131 incident shall be reported as a substantiated report.
132 15. If a facility that is exempted from an annual
133 inspection under subsection 6 of section 198.022 has one or
134 more violations of a class I standard, as described in
135 section 198.085, then such facility shall be subject to a
136 full survey by the state under section 198.022.
206.110. 1. A hospital district, both within and
outside such district, except in counties of the third or
fourth classification (other than within the district

SCS SB 841 32
boundaries) where there already exists a hospital organized
pursuant to [chapters 96, 205 or] this chapter; provided,
however, that this exception shall not prohibit the
continuation or expansion of existing activities otherwise
allowed by law, shall have and exercise the following
governmental powers, and all other powers incidental,
necessary, convenient or desirable to carry out and
effectuate the express powers:
(1) To establish and maintain a hospital or hospitals
and hospital facilities, and to construct, acquire, develop,
expand, extend and improve any such hospital or hospital
facility including medical office buildings to provide
offices for rental to physicians and dentists on the
district hospital's medical or dental staff, and the
providing of sites therefor, including offstreet parking
space for motor vehicles;
(2) To acquire land in fee simple, rights in land and
easements upon, over or across land and leasehold interest
in land and tangible and intangible personal property used
or useful for the location, establishment, maintenance,
development, expansion, extension or improvement of any
hospital or hospital facility. The acquisition may be by
dedication, purchase, gift, agreement, lease, use or adverse
possession or by condemnation;
(3) To operate, maintain and manage a hospital and
hospital facilities, and to make and enter into contracts,
for the use, operation or management of a hospital or
hospital facilities; to engage in health care activities;
and to make and enter into leases of equipment and real
property, a hospital or hospital facilities, as lessor or
lessee, regardless of the duration of such lease; and to
provide rules and regulations for the operation, management

SCS SB 841 33
or use of a hospital or hospital facilities. Any agreement
entered into pursuant to this subsection pertaining to the
lease of the hospital shall have a definite termination date
as negotiated by the parties, but this shall not preclude
the trustees from entering into a renewal of the agreement
with the same or other parties pertaining to the same or
other subjects upon such terms and conditions as the parties
may agree;
(4) To fix, charge and collect reasonable fees and
compensation for the use or occupancy of the hospital or any
part thereof, or any hospital facility, and for nursing
care, medicine, attendance, or other services furnished by
the hospital or hospital facilities, according to the rules
and regulations prescribed by the board from time to time;
(5) To borrow money and to issue bonds, notes,
certificates, or other evidences of indebtedness for the
purpose of accomplishing any of its corporate purposes,
subject to compliance with any condition or limitation set
forth in this chapter or otherwise provided by the
Constitution of the state of Missouri;
(6) To employ or enter into contracts for the
employment of any person, firm, or corporation, and for
professional services, necessary or desirable for the
accomplishment of the corporate objects of the district or
the proper administration, management, protection or control
of its property;
(7) To maintain the hospital for the benefit of the
inhabitants of the area comprising the district who are
sick, injured, or maimed regardless of race, creed or color,
and to adopt such reasonable rules and regulations as may be
necessary to render the use of the hospital of the greatest
benefit to the greatest number; to exclude from the use of

SCS SB 841 34
the hospital all persons who willfully disregard any of the
rules and regulations so established; to extend the
privileges and use of the hospital to persons residing
outside the area of the district upon such terms and
conditions as the board of directors prescribes by its rules
and regulations;
(8) To police its property and to exercise police
powers in respect thereto or in respect to the enforcement
of any rule or regulation provided by the ordinances of the
district and to employ and commission police officers and
other qualified persons to enforce the same;
(9) To lease to or allow for any institution of higher
education to use or occupy the hospital, any real estate or
facility owned or leased by the district or any part thereof
for the purpose of health care-related and general education
or training.
2. The use of any hospital or hospital facility of a
district shall be subject to the reasonable regulation and
control of the district and upon such reasonable terms and
conditions as shall be established by its board of directors.
3. A regulatory ordinance of a district adopted under
any provision of this section may provide for a suspension
or revocation of any rights or privileges within the control
of the district for a violation of any such regulatory
ordinance.
4. Nothing in this section or in other provisions of
this chapter shall be construed to authorize the district or
board to establish or enforce any regulation or rule in
respect to hospitalization or the operation or maintenance
of such hospital or any hospital facilities within its
jurisdiction which is in conflict with any federal or state
law or regulation applicable to the same subject matter.

SCS SB 841 35
206.158. 1. The board of directors of any hospital
district authorized under subsection 2 of this section, and
established and organized under the provisions of this
chapter:
(1) May invest up to fifty percent of its "available
funds", defined in this section as funds not required for
immediate disbursement in obligations or for the operation
of the hospital district, into:
(a) Any mutual funds that invest in stocks, bonds, or
real estate, or any combination thereof;
(b) Bonds that have:
a. One of the five highest long-term ratings or the
highest short-term rating issued by a nationally recognized
rating agency; and
b. A final maturity of ten years or less;
(c) Money market investments; or
(d) Any combination of investments described in
paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subdivision; and
(2) Shall invest the remaining percentage of any
available funds not invested as allowed under subdivision
(1) of this subsection into any investment in which the
state treasurer is allowed to invest.
2. The provisions of this section shall apply only if
the hospital district receives less than three percent of
its annual revenues from hospital district or state taxes.
208.149. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Clinical pathology services", professional
medical services provided by a pathologist for the
examination, diagnosis, and interpretation of laboratory
tests performed on patient specimens to aid in the diagnosis
and treatment of disease. Clinical pathology services

SCS SB 841 36
include, but are not limited to, hematology, microbiology,
immunology, clinical chemistry, molecular pathology, and
other laboratory-based diagnostic procedures;
(2) "Hospital-based pathologist", a licensed physician
specializing in pathology who provides clinical pathology
services within a hospital setting;
(3) "Professional component of clinical pathology
services", the portion of clinical pathology services that
involves the pathologist's professional expertise in
interpreting and supervising laboratory tests, excluding the
technical component of performing the laboratory tests.
2. The fee for the professional component of clinical
pathology services shall be paid by MO HealthNet for
professional services provided by a hospital-based
pathologist for inpatient clinical pathology services
rendered to patients covered by the MO HealthNet program.
3. The reimbursement amount for the professional
component of clinical pathology services shall be set at
thirty percent of the approved outpatient simplified fee
schedule based on Medicare's clinical laboratory fee
schedule for the corresponding clinical pathology services
payable by MO HealthNet.
4. (1) If the fee for the professional component of
clinical pathology services is paid for professional
services provided by a pathologist employed by the hospital
where the clinical pathology services are rendered to
covered MO HealthNet patients, the professional fee shall be
paid directly to the hospital.
(2) If the fee for the professional component of
clinical pathology services is paid for professional
services provided by a pathologist who is not employed by
the hospital where clinical pathology services are rendered

SCS SB 841 37
to covered MO HealthNet patients, the professional fee shall
be paid directly to the third party providing the services.
5. The department of social services shall promulgate
all necessary rules and regulations for the administration
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
208.662. 1. There is hereby established within the
department of social services the "Show-Me Healthy Babies
Program" as a separate children's health insurance program
(CHIP) for any low-income unborn child. The program shall
be established under the authority of Title XXI of the
federal Social Security Act, the State Children's Health
Insurance Program, as amended, and 42 CFR 457.1.
2. For an unborn child to be enrolled in the show-me
healthy babies program, his or her mother shall not be
eligible for coverage under Title XIX of the federal Social
Security Act, the Medicaid program, as it is administered by
the state, and shall not have access to affordable employer-
subsidized health care insurance or other affordable health
care coverage that includes coverage for the unborn child.
In addition, the unborn child shall be in a family with
income eligibility of no more than three hundred percent of

SCS SB 841 38
the federal poverty level, or the equivalent modified
adjusted gross income, unless the income eligibility is set
lower by the general assembly through appropriations. In
calculating family size as it relates to income eligibility,
the family shall include, in addition to other family
members, the unborn child, or in the case of a mother with a
multiple pregnancy, all unborn children.
3. Coverage for an unborn child enrolled in the show-
me healthy babies program shall include all prenatal care
and pregnancy-related services that benefit the health of
the unborn child and that promote healthy labor, delivery,
and birth, including childbirth education classes. Coverage
need not include services that are solely for the benefit of
the pregnant mother, that are unrelated to maintaining or
promoting a healthy pregnancy, and that provide no benefit
to the unborn child. However, the department may include
pregnancy-related assistance as defined in 42 U.S.C. Section
1397ll.
4. There shall be no waiting period before an unborn
child may be enrolled in the show-me healthy babies
program. In accordance with the definition of child in 42
CFR 457.10, coverage shall include the period from
conception to birth. The department shall develop a
presumptive eligibility procedure for enrolling an unborn
child. There shall be verification of the pregnancy.
5. Coverage for the child shall continue for up to one
year after birth, unless otherwise prohibited by law or
unless otherwise limited by the general assembly through
appropriations.
6. (1) Pregnancy-related and postpartum coverage for
the mother shall begin on the day the pregnancy ends and
extend through the last day of the month that includes the

SCS SB 841 39
sixtieth day after the pregnancy ends, unless otherwise
prohibited by law or unless otherwise limited by the general
assembly through appropriations. The department may include
pregnancy-related assistance as defined in 42 U.S.C. Section
1397ll.
(2) (a) Subject to approval of any necessary state
plan amendments or waivers, beginning on July 6, 2023,
mothers eligible to receive coverage under this section
shall receive medical assistance benefits during the
pregnancy and during the twelve-month period that begins on
the last day of the woman's pregnancy and ends on the last
day of the month in which such twelve-month period ends,
consistent with the provisions of 42 U.S.C. Section
1397gg(e)(1)(J). The department shall seek any necessary
state plan amendments or waivers to implement the provisions
of this subdivision when the number of ineligible MO
HealthNet participants removed from the program in 2023
pursuant to section 208.239 exceeds the projected number of
beneficiaries likely to enroll in benefits in 2023 under
this subdivision and subdivision (28) of subsection 1 of
section 208.151, as determined by the department, by at
least one hundred individuals.
(b) The provisions of this subdivision shall remain in
effect for any period of time during which the federal
authority under 42 U.S.C. Section 1397gg(e)(1)(J), as
amended, or any successor statutes or implementing
regulations, is in effect.
7. The department shall provide coverage for an unborn
child enrolled in the show-me healthy babies program in the
same manner in which the department provides coverage for
the children's health insurance program (CHIP) in the county
of the primary residence of the mother.

SCS SB 841 40
8. The department shall provide information about the
show-me healthy babies program to maternity homes as defined
in section 135.600, pregnancy resource centers as defined in
section 135.630, and other similar agencies and programs in
the state that assist unborn children and their mothers.
The department shall consider allowing such agencies and
programs to assist in the enrollment of unborn children in
the program, and in making determinations about presumptive
eligibility and verification of the pregnancy.
9. Within sixty days after August 28, 2014, the
department shall submit a state plan amendment or seek any
necessary waivers from the federal Department of Health and
Human Services requesting approval for the show-me healthy
babies program.
10. At least annually, the department shall prepare
and submit a report to the governor, the speaker of the
house of representatives, and the president pro tempore of
the senate analyzing and projecting the cost savings and
benefits, if any, to the state, counties, local communities,
100 school districts, law enforcement agencies, correctional
101 centers, health care providers, employers, other public and
102 private entities, and persons by enrolling unborn children
103 in the show-me healthy babies program. The analysis and
104 projection of cost savings and benefits, if any, may include
105 but need not be limited to:
106 (1) The higher federal matching rate for having an
107 unborn child enrolled in the show-me healthy babies program
108 versus the lower federal matching rate for a pregnant woman
109 being enrolled in MO HealthNet or other federal programs;
110 (2) The efficacy in providing services to unborn
111 children through managed care organizations, group or
112 individual health insurance providers or premium assistance,

SCS SB 841 41
113 or through other nontraditional arrangements of providing
114 health care;
115 (3) The change in the proportion of unborn children
116 who receive care in the first trimester of pregnancy due to
117 a lack of waiting periods, by allowing presumptive
118 eligibility, or by removal of other barriers, and any
119 resulting or projected decrease in health problems and other
120 problems for unborn children and women throughout pregnancy;
121 at labor, delivery, and birth; and during infancy and
122 childhood;
123 (4) The change in healthy behaviors by pregnant women,
124 such as the cessation of the use of tobacco, alcohol,
125 illicit drugs, or other harmful practices, and any resulting
126 or projected short-term and long-term decrease in birth
127 defects; poor motor skills; vision, speech, and hearing
128 problems; breathing and respiratory problems; feeding and
129 digestive problems; and other physical, mental, educational,
130 and behavioral problems; and
131 (5) The change in infant and maternal mortality,
132 preterm births and low birth weight babies and any resulting
133 or projected decrease in short-term and long-term medical
134 and other interventions.
135 11. The show-me healthy babies program shall not be
136 deemed an entitlement program, but instead shall be subject
137 to a federal allotment or other federal appropriations and
138 matching state appropriations.
139 12. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
140 obligating the state to continue the show-me healthy babies
141 program if the allotment or payments from the federal
142 government end or are not sufficient for the program to
143 operate, or if the general assembly does not appropriate
144 funds for the program.

SCS SB 841 42
145 13. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
146 expanding MO HealthNet or fulfilling a mandate imposed by
147 the federal government on the state.
208.1400. Sections 208.1400 to 208.1425 shall be known
and may be cited as the "Missouri Doula Reimbursement Act".
208.1405. For purposes of sections 208.1400 to
208.1425, the following terms mean:
(1) "Community-based network", a network that is
representative of a community or significant segments of a
community and engaged in meeting that community's needs in
the area of social, human, or health services;
(2) "Community navigation services", services that
connect pregnant individuals and their families with
available resources using a community-based approach
including, but not limited to, an approach that understands
the services and supports available to pregnant and
postpartum individuals receiving MO HealthNet benefits and
facilitates access to those resources based upon an
assessment of social service needs;
(3) "Doula", a trained professional providing
continuous physical, emotional, and informational support to
a pregnant individual, from the prenatal, the intrapartum,
and up to the first twelve months of the postpartum
periods. Doulas also provide assistance by referring
pregnant individuals to community-based networks and
certified and licensed perinatal professionals in multiple
disciplines;
(4) "Doula services", services provided by a doula;
(5) "Fee-for-service", a payment model where services
are unbundled and paid for separately;

SCS SB 841 43
(6) "Intrapartum", the period of pregnancy during
labor and delivery or childbirth. Services provided during
this period are rendered to the pregnant individual;
(7) "Managed care", the delivery of Medicaid health
benefits and additional services through contracted
arrangements between state Medicaid agencies and managed
care organizations that accept a set per member per month
(capitation) payment for these services;
(8) "Postpartum", the one-year period after a
pregnancy ends;
(9) "Prenatal", the period of pregnancy before labor
or childbirth. Services provided during this period are
rendered to the pregnant individual.
208.1410. The following doula services shall be
covered by the MO HealthNet program:
(1) A combined total of six prenatal and postpartum
support sessions;
(2) One birth attendance;
(3) Up to two visits for general consultation on
lactation at any time during the prenatal and postpartum
periods; and
(4) Community navigation services, except that any
community navigation services provided outside any visit or
session billed under subdivisions (1) to (3) of this section
shall be billed only up to ten times total over the course
of the pregnancy and postpartum period.
208.1415. A doula shall be eligible for participation
as a provider of doula services covered by the MO HealthNet
program only if the doula:
(1) Is enrolled as a MO HealthNet provider;
(2) Is eighteen years of age or older;

SCS SB 841 44
(3) Holds liability insurance as an individual or
through a supervising organization; and
(4) Either:
(a) Possesses a current certificate issued by a
national or Missouri-based doula training organization whose
curriculum meets guidelines established by the MO HealthNet
division by rule; or
(b) Received training from a source not described in
paragraph (a) of this subdivision, or from multiple sources,
whose curriculum meets the guidelines established under
paragraph (a) of this subdivision as verified by a public
roster maintained by a statewide organization composed of
doula trainers from three or more independent, well-
established doula training organizations located in Missouri
whose purpose includes the validation of core competencies
of training.
208.1420. 1. Once enrolled as a MO HealthNet
provider, a doula shall be eligible to enroll as a provider
with fee-for-service and managed care payers affiliated with
the MO HealthNet program.
2. Doula services shall be reimbursed on a fee-for-
service schedule.
208.1425. The MO HealthNet division shall promulgate
all necessary rules and regulations for the administration
of sections 208.1400 to 208.1425. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay

SCS SB 841 45
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
210.225. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as "Elijah's Law".
2. (1) Before July 1, 2028, each licensed child care
provider shall adopt a policy on allergy prevention and
response with priority given to addressing potentially
deadly food-borne allergies. Such policy shall contain, but
shall not be limited to, the following elements:
(a) Distinguishing between building-wide, room-level,
and individual approaches to allergy prevention and
management;
(b) Providing an age-appropriate response to building-
level and room-level allergy education and prevention;
(c) Describing the role of child care facility staff
in determining how to manage an allergy problem, whether
through a plan prepared for a child under Section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, for a child with an
allergy that has been determined to be a disability, an
individualized health plan for a child who has an allergy
that is not disabling, or another allergy management plan;
(d) Describing the role of other children and parents
in cooperating to prevent and mitigate allergies;
(e) Addressing confidentiality issues involved with
sharing medical information, including specifying when
parental permission is required to make medical information
available; and
(f) Coordinating with the department of elementary and
secondary education, local health authorities, and other
appropriate entities to ensure efficient promulgation of

SCS SB 841 46
accurate information and to ensure that existing child care
facility safety and environmental policies do not conflict.
(2) Such policies may contain information from or
links to child care facility allergy prevention information
furnished by the Food Allergy Research & Education
organization or equivalent organization with a medical
advisory board that has allergy specialists.
3. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall, in cooperation with any appropriate
professional association, develop a model policy or policies
before July 1, 2027.
321.621. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Epinephrine delivery device", a single-use device
used for the delivery of a premeasured dose of epinephrine
into the human body;
(2) "Qualified first responder" [shall mean], any
state and local law enforcement agency staff, fire
department personnel, fire district personnel, or licensed
emergency medical technician who is acting under the
directives and established protocols of a medical director
who comes in contact with a person suffering from an
anaphylactic reaction and who has received training in
recognizing and responding to anaphylactic reactions and the
administration of epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
devices to a person suffering from an apparent anaphylactic
reaction[.];
(3) "Qualified first responder agencies" [shall mean],
any state or local law enforcement agency, fire department,
or ambulance service that provides documented training to
its staff related to the administration of epinephrine [auto-

SCS SB 841 47
injector] delivery devices in an apparent anaphylactic
reaction.
2. The director of the department of health and senior
services, if a licensed physician, may issue a statewide
standing order for epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
devices for adult patients to fire protection districts in
nonmetropolitan areas in Missouri as such areas are
determined according to the United States Census Bureau's
American Community Survey, based on the most recent of five-
year period estimate data in which the final year of the
estimate ends in either zero or five. If the director of
the department of health and senior services is not a
licensed physician, the department of health and senior
services may employ or contract with a licensed physician
who may issue such a statewide order with the express
consent of the director.
3. Possession and use of epinephrine [auto-injector]
delivery devices for adult patients shall be limited as
follows:
(1) No person shall use an epinephrine [auto-injector]
delivery device pursuant to this section unless such person
has successfully completed a training course in the use of
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery devices for adult
patients approved by the director of the department of
health and senior services. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit the use of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
device:
(a) By a health care professional licensed or
certified by this state who is acting within the scope of
his or her practice; or
(b) By a person acting pursuant to a lawful
prescription;

SCS SB 841 48
(2) Every person, firm, organization and entity
authorized to possess and use epinephrine [auto-injector]
delivery devices for adult patients pursuant to this section
shall use, maintain and dispose of such devices for adult
patients in accordance with the rules of the department; and
(3) Every use of an epinephrine [auto-injector]
delivery device pursuant to this section shall immediately
be reported to the emergency health care provider as defined
in section 190.246.
4. (1) Use of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
device pursuant to this section shall be considered first
aid or emergency treatment for the purpose of any law
relating to liability.
(2) Purchase, acquisition, possession or use of an
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device pursuant to this
section shall not constitute the unlawful practice of
medicine or the unlawful practice of a profession.
(3) Any person otherwise authorized to sell or provide
an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device may sell or
provide it to a person authorized to possess it pursuant to
this section.
5. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Epinephrine [Auto-injector] Delivery Devices for Fire
Personnel Fund", which shall consist of [money collected
under this section] moneys appropriated to the fund. The
state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The moneys in the fund
as set forth in this section shall be subject to
appropriation by the general assembly for the particular
purpose for which collected. The fund shall be a dedicated
fund and money in the fund shall be used solely by the

SCS SB 841 49
department of health and senior services for the purposes of
providing epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery devices for
adult patients to qualified first responder agencies as used
in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
332.081. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, hospitals licensed under chapter 197
shall be authorized to employ any or all of the following
oral health providers:
(1) A dentist licensed under this chapter for the
purpose of treating on hospital premises those patients who
present with a dental condition and such treatment is
necessary to ameliorate the condition for which they
presented such as severe pain or tooth abscesses;
(2) An oral and maxillofacial surgeon licensed under
this chapter for the purpose of treating oral conditions
that need to be ameliorated as part of treating the
underlying cause of the patient's medical needs including,
but not limited to, head and neck cancer, HIV or AIDS,
severe trauma resulting in admission to the hospital, organ
transplant, diabetes, or seizure disorders. It shall be a
condition of treatment that such patients are admitted to
the hospital on either an in- or out-patient basis; and
(3) A maxillofacial prosthodontist licensed under this
chapter for the purpose of treating and supporting patients

SCS SB 841 50
of a head and neck cancer team or other complex care or
surgical team for the fabrication of appliances following
ablative surgery, surgery to correct birth anomalies,
extensive radiation treatment of the head or neck, or trauma-
related surgery.
2. No person or other entity shall practice dentistry
in Missouri or provide dental services as [defined]
described in section 332.071 unless and until the board has
issued to the person a certificate certifying that the
person has been duly registered as a dentist in Missouri or
the board has issued such certificate to an entity that has
been duly registered to provide dental services by licensed
dentists and dental hygienists and unless and until the
board has issued to the person a license, to be renewed each
period, as provided in this chapter, to practice dentistry
or as a dental hygienist, or has issued to the person or
entity a permit, to be renewed each period, to provide
dental services in Missouri. Nothing in this chapter shall
be so construed as to make it unlawful for:
(1) A legally qualified physician or surgeon, who does
not practice dentistry as a specialty, from extracting teeth;
(2) A dentist licensed in a state other than Missouri
from making a clinical demonstration before a meeting of
dentists in Missouri;
(3) Dental students in any accredited dental school to
practice dentistry under the personal direction of
instructors;
(4) Dental hygiene students in any accredited dental
hygiene school to practice dental hygiene under the personal
direction of instructors;

SCS SB 841 51
(5) A duly registered and licensed dental hygienist in
Missouri to practice dental hygiene as defined in section
332.091;
(6) A dental assistant, certified dental assistant, or
expanded functions dental assistant to be delegated duties
as defined in section 332.093;
(7) A duly registered dentist or dental hygienist to
teach in an accredited dental or dental hygiene school;
(8) A person who has been granted a dental faculty
permit under section 332.183 to practice dentistry in the
scope of his or her employment at an accredited dental
school, college, or program in Missouri;
(9) A duly qualified anesthesiologist or nurse
anesthetist to administer an anesthetic in connection with
dental services or dental surgery;
(10) A person to practice dentistry in or for:
(a) The United States Armed Forces;
(b) The United States Public Health Service;
(c) Migrant, community, or health care for the
homeless health centers provided in Section 330 of the
Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Section 254b);
(d) Federally qualified health centers as defined in
Section 1905(l) (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)) of the Social
Security Act;
(e) Governmental entities, including county health
departments; or
(f) The United States Veterans Bureau; or
(11) A dentist licensed in a state other than Missouri
to evaluate a patient or render an oral, written, or
otherwise documented dental opinion when providing testimony
or records for the purpose of a civil or criminal action

SCS SB 841 52
before any judicial or administrative proceeding of this
state or other forum in this state.
3. No corporation shall practice dentistry as defined
in section 332.071 unless that corporation is organized
under the provisions of chapter 355 or 356 provided that a
corporation organized under the provisions of chapter 355
and qualifying as an organization under 26 U.S.C. Section
501(c)(3) may only employ dentists and dental hygienists
licensed in this state to render dental services to Medicaid
recipients, low-income individuals who have available income
below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level, and
all participants in the SCHIP program, unless such
limitation is contrary to or inconsistent with federal or
state law or regulation. This subsection shall not apply to:
(1) A hospital licensed under chapter 197 that
provides care and treatment only to children under the age
of eighteen at which a person regulated under this chapter
provides dental care within the scope of his or her license
100 or registration;
101 (2) A federally qualified health center as defined in
102 Section 1905(l) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.
103 Section 1396d(l)), or a migrant, community, or health care
104 for the homeless health center provided for in Section 330
105 of the Public Health Services Act (42 U.S.C. Section 254b)
106 at which a person regulated under this chapter provides
107 dental care within the scope of his or her license or
108 registration;
109 (3) A city or county health department organized under
110 chapter 192 or chapter 205 at which a person regulated under
111 this chapter provides dental care within the scope of his or
112 her license or registration;

SCS SB 841 53
113 (4) A social welfare board organized under section
114 205.770, a city health department operating under a city
115 charter, or a city-county health department at which a
116 person regulated under this chapter provides dental care
117 within the scope of his or her license or registration;
118 (5) Any entity that has received a permit from the
119 dental board and does not receive compensation from the
120 patient or from any third party on the patient's behalf at
121 which a person regulated under this chapter provides dental
122 care within the scope of his or her license or registration;
123 or
124 (6) Any hospital nonprofit corporation exempt from
125 taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
126 Code, as amended, that engages in its operations and
127 provides dental services at facilities owned by a city,
128 county, or other political subdivision of the state, or any
129 entity contracted with the state to provide care in a
130 correctional center, as such term is defined in section
131 217.010, at which a person regulated under this chapter
132 provides dental care within the scope of his or her license
133 or registration.
134 If any of the entities exempted from the requirements of
135 this subsection are unable to provide services to a patient
136 due to the lack of a qualified provider and a referral to
137 another entity is made, the exemption shall extend to the
138 person or entity that subsequently provides services to the
139 patient.
140 4. No unincorporated organization shall practice
141 dentistry as defined in section 332.071 unless such
142 organization is exempt from federal taxation under Section
143 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,

SCS SB 841 54
144 and provides dental treatment without compensation from the
145 patient or any third party on their behalf as a part of a
146 broader program of social services including food
147 distribution. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit
148 organizations under this subsection from employing any
149 person regulated by this chapter.
150 5. A dentist shall not enter into a contract that
151 allows a person who is not a dentist to influence or
152 interfere with the exercise of the dentist's independent
153 professional judgment.
154 6. A not-for-profit corporation organized under the
155 provisions of chapter 355 and qualifying as an organization
156 under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3), an unincorporated
157 organization operating pursuant to subsection 4 of this
158 section, or any other person should not direct or interfere
159 or attempt to direct or interfere with a licensed dentist's
160 professional judgment and competent practice of dentistry.
161 Nothing in this subsection shall be so construed as to make
162 it unlawful for not-for-profit organizations to enforce
163 employment contracts, corporate policy and procedure
164 manuals, or quality improvement or assurance requirements.
165 7. All entities defined in subsection 3 of this
166 section and those exempted under subsection 4 of this
167 section shall apply for a permit to employ dentists and
168 dental hygienists licensed in this state to render dental
169 services, and the entity shall apply for the permit in
170 writing on forms provided by the Missouri dental board. The
171 board shall not charge a fee of any kind for the issuance or
172 renewal of such permit. The provisions of this subsection
173 shall not apply to a federally qualified health center as
174 defined in Section 1905(l) of the Social Security Act (42
175 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)).

SCS SB 841 55
176 8. Any entity that obtains a permit to render dental
177 services in this state is subject to discipline pursuant to
178 section 332.321. If the board concludes that the person or
179 entity has committed an act or is engaging in a course of
180 conduct that would be grounds for disciplinary action, the
181 board may file a complaint before the administrative hearing
182 commission. The board may refuse to issue or renew the
183 permit of any entity for one or any combination of causes
184 stated in subsection 2 of section 332.321. The board shall
185 notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the
186 refusal and shall advise the applicant of his or her right
187 to file a complaint with the administrative hearing
188 commission as provided by chapter 621.
189 9. A federally qualified health center as defined in
190 Section 1905(l) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.
191 Section 1396d(l)) shall register with the board. The
192 information provided to the board as part of the
193 registration shall include the name of the health center,
194 the nonprofit status of the health center, sites where
195 dental services will be provided, and the names of all
196 persons employed by, or contracting with, the health center
197 who are required to hold a license pursuant to this
198 chapter. The registration shall be renewed every twenty-
199 four months. The board shall not charge a fee of any kind
200 for the issuance or renewal of the registration. The
201 registration of the health center shall not be subject to
202 discipline pursuant to section 332.321. Nothing in this
203 subsection shall prohibit disciplinary action against a
204 licensee of this chapter who is employed by, or contracts
205 with, such health center for the actions of the licensee in
206 connection with such employment or contract.

SCS SB 841 56
207 10. The board may promulgate rules and regulations to
208 ensure not-for-profit corporations are rendering care to the
209 patient populations as set forth herein, including
210 requirements for covered not-for-profit corporations to
211 report patient census data to the board. The provisions of
212 this subsection shall not apply to a federally qualified
213 health center as defined in Section 1905(l) of the Social
214 Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)).
215 11. All not-for-profit corporations organized or
216 operated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 355 and
217 qualifying as an organization under 26 U.S.C. Section
218 501(c)(3), or the requirements relating to migrant,
219 community, or health care for the homeless health centers
220 provided in Section 330 of the Public Health Service Act (42
221 U.S.C. Section 254b) and federally qualified health centers
222 as defined in Section 1905(l) (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l))
223 of the Social Security Act, that employ persons who practice
224 dentistry or dental hygiene in this state shall do so in
225 accordance with the relevant laws of this state except to
226 the extent that such laws are contrary to, or inconsistent
227 with, federal statute or regulation.
334.108. 1. Prior to prescribing any drug, controlled
substance, or other treatment through telemedicine, as
defined in section 191.1145, or the internet, a physician
shall establish a valid physician-patient relationship as
described in section 191.1146. This relationship shall
include:
(1) Obtaining a reliable medical history and, if
required to meet the standard of care, performing a physical
examination of the patient, adequate to establish the
diagnosis for which the drug is being prescribed and to

SCS SB 841 57
identify underlying conditions or contraindications to the
treatment recommended or provided;
(2) Having sufficient [dialogue] exchange with the
patient regarding treatment options and the risks and
benefits of treatment or treatments;
(3) If appropriate, following up with the patient to
assess the therapeutic outcome;
(4) Maintaining a contemporaneous medical record that
is readily available to the patient and, subject to the
patient's consent, to the patient's other health care
professionals; and
(5) Maintaining the electronic prescription
information as part of the patient's medical record.
2. The requirements of subsection 1 of this section
may be satisfied by the prescribing physician's designee
when treatment is provided in:
(1) A hospital as defined in section 197.020;
(2) A hospice program as defined in section 197.250;
(3) Home health services provided by a home health
agency as defined in section 197.400;
(4) Accordance with a collaborative practice agreement
as [defined] described in section 334.104;
(5) Conjunction with a physician assistant licensed
pursuant to section 334.738;
(6) Conjunction with an assistant physician licensed
under section 334.036;
(7) Consultation with another physician who has an
ongoing physician-patient relationship with the patient, and
who has agreed to supervise the patient's treatment,
including use of any prescribed medications; or
(8) On-call or cross-coverage situations.

SCS SB 841 58
3. No health care provider, as defined in section
376.1350, shall prescribe any drug, controlled substance, or
other treatment to a patient based solely on an evaluation
[over the telephone] through telemedicine; except that, a
physician or such physician's on-call designee, or an
advanced practice registered nurse, a physician assistant,
or an assistant physician in a collaborative practice
arrangement with such physician, may prescribe any drug,
controlled substance, or other treatment that is within his
or her scope of practice to a patient based solely on a
[telephone] telemedicine evaluation if a previously
established and ongoing physician-patient relationship
exists between such physician and the patient being treated.
4. No health care provider shall prescribe any drug,
controlled substance, or other treatment to a patient [based
solely on an internet request or an internet questionnaire]
in the absence of a proper provider-patient relationship, as
described in section 191.1146.
5. Medical records of any drug, controlled substance,
or other treatment prescribed through telemedicine, as
defined in section 191.1145, shall be collected, stored, and
maintained in accordance with the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, which allows for
the sharing of protected health information for continuity
of care between health care providers for treatment,
payment, and health care operations.
335.081. So long as the person involved does not
represent or hold himself or herself out as a nurse licensed
to practice in this state, no provision of sections 335.011
to 335.096 shall be construed as prohibiting:

SCS SB 841 59
(1) The practice of any profession for which a license
is required and issued pursuant to the laws of this state by
a person duly licensed to practice that profession;
(2) The services rendered by technicians, nurses'
aides or their equivalent trained and employed in public or
private hospitals and licensed long-term care facilities
except the services rendered in licensed long-term care
facilities shall be limited to administering medication,
excluding injectable medications other than:
(a) Insulin;
(b) Subcutaneous injectable medications to treat
diabetes as ordered by an individual legally authorized to
prescribe such medications; and
(c) Epinephrine delivery devices ordered for stock
supply in accordance with section 196.990 or prescribed for
a resident's individual use by an individual legally
authorized to prescribe such epinephrine delivery devices.
Expected epinephrine delivery device users shall receive
training set forth in section 196.990. As used in this
paragraph, the term "epinephrine delivery device" means a
single-use device used for the delivery of a premeasured
dose of epinephrine into the human body;
(3) The providing of nursing care by friends or
members of the family of the person receiving such care;
(4) The incidental care of the sick, aged, or infirm
by domestic servants or persons primarily employed as
housekeepers;
(5) The furnishing of nursing assistance in the case
of an emergency situation;
(6) The practice of nursing under proper supervision:

SCS SB 841 60
(a) As a part of the course of study by students
enrolled in approved schools of professional nursing or in
schools of practical nursing;
(b) By graduates of accredited nursing programs
pending the results of the first licensing examination or
ninety days after graduation, whichever first occurs;
(c) A graduate nurse who is prevented from attending
the first licensing examination following graduation by
reason of active duty in the military may practice as a
graduate nurse pending the results of the first licensing
examination scheduled by the board following the release of
such graduate nurse from active military duty or pending the
results of the first licensing examination taken by the
graduate nurse while involved in active military service
whichever comes first;
(7) The practice of nursing in this state by any
legally qualified nurse duly licensed to practice in another
state whose engagement requires such nurse to accompany and
care for a patient temporarily residing in this state for a
period not to exceed six months;
(8) The practice of any legally qualified nurse who is
employed by the government of the United States or any
bureau, division or agency thereof, while in the discharge
of his or her official duties or to the practice of any
legally qualified nurse serving in the Armed Forces of the
United States while stationed within this state;
(9) Nonmedical nursing care of the sick with or
without compensation when done in connection with the
practice of the religious tenets of any church by adherents
thereof, as long as they do not engage in the practice of
nursing as defined in sections 335.011 to 335.096;

SCS SB 841 61
(10) The practice of any legally qualified and
licensed nurse of another state, territory, or foreign
country whose responsibilities include transporting patients
into, out of, or through this state while actively engaged
in patient transport that does not exceed forty-eight hours
in this state.
338.010. 1. The "practice of pharmacy" includes:
(1) The interpretation, implementation, and evaluation
of medical prescription orders, including any legend drugs
under 21 U.S.C. Section 353, and the receipt, transmission,
or handling of such orders or facilitating the dispensing of
such orders;
(2) The designing, initiating, implementing, and
monitoring of a medication therapeutic plan in accordance
with the provisions of this section;
(3) The compounding, dispensing, labeling, and
administration of drugs and devices pursuant to medical
prescription orders;
(4) The ordering and administration of vaccines
approved or authorized by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration, excluding vaccines for cholera, monkeypox,
Japanese encephalitis, typhoid, rabies, yellow fever, tick-
borne encephalitis, anthrax, tuberculosis, dengue, Hib,
polio, rotavirus, smallpox, chikungunya, and any vaccine
approved after January 1, [2023] 2026, to persons at least
seven years of age or the age recommended by the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention, whichever is older, pursuant
to joint promulgation of rules established by the board of
pharmacy and the state board of registration for the healing
arts unless rules are established under a state of emergency
as described in section 44.100;

SCS SB 841 62
(5) The participation in drug selection according to
state law and participation in drug utilization reviews;
(6) The proper and safe storage of drugs and devices
and the maintenance of proper records thereof;
(7) Consultation with patients and other health care
practitioners, and veterinarians and their clients about
legend drugs, about the safe and effective use of drugs and
devices;
(8) The prescribing and dispensing of any nicotine
replacement therapy product under section 338.665;
(9) The dispensing of HIV postexposure prophylaxis
pursuant to section 338.730; and
(10) The offering or performing of those acts,
services, operations, or transactions necessary in the
conduct, operation, management and control of a pharmacy.
2. No person shall engage in the practice of pharmacy
unless he or she is licensed under the provisions of this
chapter.
3. This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit the
use of auxiliary personnel under the direct supervision of a
pharmacist from assisting the pharmacist in any of his or
her duties. This assistance in no way is intended to
relieve the pharmacist from his or her responsibilities for
compliance with this chapter and he or she will be
responsible for the actions of the auxiliary personnel
acting in his or her assistance.
4. This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit or
interfere with any legally registered practitioner of
medicine, dentistry, or podiatry, or veterinary medicine
only for use in animals, or the practice of optometry in
accordance with and as provided in sections 195.070 and

SCS SB 841 63
336.220 in the compounding, administering, prescribing, or
dispensing of his or her own prescriptions.
5. A pharmacist with a certificate of medication
therapeutic plan authority may provide medication therapy
services pursuant to a written protocol from a physician
licensed under chapter 334 to patients who have established
a physician-patient relationship, as described in
subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 191.1146, with
the protocol physician. The written protocol authorized by
this section shall come only from the physician and shall
not come from a nurse engaged in a collaborative practice
arrangement under section 334.104, or from a physician
assistant engaged in a collaborative practice arrangement
under section 334.735.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed as to
prevent any person, firm or corporation from owning a
pharmacy regulated by sections 338.210 to 338.315, provided
that a licensed pharmacist is in charge of such pharmacy.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply
to or interfere with the sale of nonprescription drugs and
the ordinary household remedies and such drugs or medicines
as are normally sold by those engaged in the sale of general
merchandise.
8. No health carrier as defined in chapter 376 shall
require any physician with which they contract to enter into
a written protocol with a pharmacist for medication
therapeutic services.
9. This section shall not be construed to allow a
pharmacist to diagnose or independently prescribe
pharmaceuticals.
10. The state board of registration for the healing
arts, under section 334.125, and the state board of

SCS SB 841 64
pharmacy, under section 338.140, shall jointly promulgate
rules regulating the use of protocols for medication therapy
services. Such rules shall require protocols to include
provisions allowing for timely communication between the
pharmacist and the protocol physician or similar body
authorized by this section, and any other patient protection
provisions deemed appropriate by both boards. In order to
take effect, such rules shall be approved by a majority vote
of a quorum of each board. Neither board shall separately
promulgate rules regulating the use of protocols for
medication therapy services. Any rule or portion of a rule,
100 as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
101 under the authority delegated in this section shall become
102 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
103 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
104 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
105 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
106 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
107 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
108 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
109 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
110 2007, shall be invalid and void.
111 11. The state board of pharmacy may grant a
112 certificate of medication therapeutic plan authority to a
113 licensed pharmacist who submits proof of successful
114 completion of a board-approved course of academic clinical
115 study beyond a bachelor of science in pharmacy, including
116 but not limited to clinical assessment skills, from a
117 nationally accredited college or university, or a
118 certification of equivalence issued by a nationally
119 recognized professional organization and approved by the
120 board of pharmacy.

SCS SB 841 65
121 12. Any pharmacist who has received a certificate of
122 medication therapeutic plan authority may engage in the
123 designing, initiating, implementing, and monitoring of a
124 medication therapeutic plan as defined by a written protocol
125 from a physician that may be specific to each patient for
126 care by a pharmacist.
127 13. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
128 allow a pharmacist to make a therapeutic substitution of a
129 pharmaceutical prescribed by a physician unless authorized
130 by the written protocol or the physician's prescription
131 order.
132 14. "Veterinarian", "doctor of veterinary medicine",
133 "practitioner of veterinary medicine", "DVM", "VMD", "BVSe",
134 "BVMS", "BSe (Vet Science)", "VMB", "MRCVS", or an
135 equivalent title means a person who has received a doctor's
136 degree in veterinary medicine from an accredited school of
137 veterinary medicine or holds an Educational Commission for
138 Foreign Veterinary Graduates (EDFVG) certificate issued by
139 the American Veterinary Medical Association (AVMA).
140 15. In addition to other requirements established by
141 the joint promulgation of rules by the board of pharmacy and
142 the state board of registration for the healing arts:
143 (1) A pharmacist shall administer vaccines by protocol
144 in accordance with treatment guidelines established by the
145 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC);
146 (2) A pharmacist who is administering a vaccine shall
147 request a patient to remain in the pharmacy a safe amount of
148 time after administering the vaccine to observe any adverse
149 reactions. Such pharmacist shall have adopted emergency
150 treatment protocols.
151 16. In addition to other requirements by the board, a
152 pharmacist shall receive additional training as required by

SCS SB 841 66
153 the board and evidenced by receiving a certificate from the
154 board upon completion, and shall display the certification
155 in his or her pharmacy where vaccines are delivered.
156 17. A pharmacist shall inform the patient that the
157 administration of a vaccine will be entered into the
158 ShowMeVax system, as administered by the department of
159 health and senior services. The patient shall attest to the
160 inclusion of such information in the system by signing a
161 form provided by the pharmacist. If the patient indicates
162 that he or she does not want such information entered into
163 the ShowMeVax system, the pharmacist shall provide a written
164 report within fourteen days of administration of a vaccine
165 to the patient's health care provider, if provided by the
166 patient, containing:
167 (1) The identity of the patient;
168 (2) The identity of the vaccine or vaccines
169 administered;
170 (3) The route of administration;
171 (4) The anatomic site of the administration;
172 (5) The dose administered; and
173 (6) The date of administration.
174 18. A pharmacist licensed under this chapter may order
175 and administer vaccines approved or authorized by the U.S.
176 Food and Drug Administration to address a public health
177 need, as lawfully authorized by the state or federal
178 government, or a department or agency thereof, during a
179 state or federally declared public health emergency.
338.333. 1. Except as otherwise provided by the board
of pharmacy by rule in the event of an emergency or to
alleviate a supply shortage, no person or distribution
outlet shall act as a wholesale drug distributor, pharmacy
distributor, drug outsourcer, or third-party logistics

SCS SB 841 67
provider without first obtaining license to do so from the
Missouri board of pharmacy and paying the required fee. The
board may grant temporary licenses when the wholesale drug
distributor, pharmacy distributor, drug outsourcer, or third-
party logistics provider first applies for a license to
operate within the state. Temporary licenses shall remain
valid until such time as the board shall find that the
applicant meets or fails to meet the requirements for
regular licensure. No license shall be issued or renewed
for a wholesale drug distributor, pharmacy distributor, drug
outsourcer, or third-party logistics provider to operate
unless the same shall be operated in a manner prescribed by
law and according to the rules and regulations promulgated
by the board of pharmacy with respect thereto. Separate
licenses shall be required for each distribution site owned
or operated by a wholesale drug distributor, pharmacy
distributor, drug outsourcer, or third-party logistics
provider, unless such drug distributor, pharmacy
distributor, drug outsourcer, or third-party logistics
provider meets the requirements of section 338.335.
2. An agent or employee of any licensed or registered
wholesale drug distributor, pharmacy distributor, drug
outsourcer, or third-party logistics provider need not seek
licensure under this section and may lawfully possess
pharmaceutical drugs, if the agent or employee is acting in
the usual course of his or her business or employment.
3. The board may permit out-of-state wholesale drug
distributors, drug outsourcers, third-party logistics
[provider] providers, or out-of-state pharmacy distributors
to be licensed as required by sections 338.210 to 338.370 on
the basis of reciprocity to the extent that the entity both:

SCS SB 841 68
(1) Possesses a valid license granted by another state
pursuant to legal standards comparable to those which must
be met by a wholesale drug distributor, pharmacy
distributor, drug [outsourcers] outsourcer, or third-party
logistics provider of this state as prerequisites for
obtaining a license under the laws of this state. If a
state license is not issued by their resident state, out-of-
state wholesale drug distributors and third-party logistics
providers with a current and valid drug distributor
accreditation from the National Association of Boards of
Pharmacy or its successor may be eligible for licensure as
provided by the board by rule; and
(2) Distributes into Missouri from a state which would
extend reciprocal treatment under its own laws to a
wholesale drug distributor, pharmacy distributor, drug
outsourcers, or third-party logistics provider of this state.
338.710. 1. There is hereby created in the Missouri
board of pharmacy the "RX Cares for Missouri Program". The
goal of the program shall be to promote medication safety
and to prevent prescription drug abuse, misuse, and
diversion in Missouri.
2. The board, in consultation with the department,
shall be authorized to expend, allocate, or award funds
appropriated to the board to private or public entities to
develop or provide programs or education to promote
medication safety or to suppress or prevent prescription
drug abuse, misuse, and diversion in the state of Missouri.
In no case shall the authorization include, nor the funds be
expended for, any state prescription drug monitoring program
including, but not limited to, such as are defined in 38 CFR
1.515. Funds disbursed to a state agency under this section

SCS SB 841 69
may enhance, but shall not supplant, funds otherwise
appropriated to such state agency.
3. The board shall be the administrative agency
responsible for implementing the program in consultation
with the department. The board and the department may enter
into interagency agreements between themselves to allow the
department to assist in the management or operation of the
program. The board may award funds directly to the
department to implement, manage, develop, or provide
programs or education pursuant to the program.
4. After a full year of program operation, the board
shall prepare and submit an evaluation report to the
governor and the general assembly describing the operation
of the program and the funds allocated. [Unless otherwise
authorized by the general assembly, the program shall expire
on August 28, 2026.]
376.1245. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Anesthesia time", the period during which an
anesthesia practitioner is present with the patient,
starting when the anesthesia practitioner begins to prepare
the patient for anesthesia services in the operating room or
an equivalent area and ending when the anesthesia
practitioner is no longer furnishing anesthesia services to
the patient because the patient may be placed safely under
postoperative or postanesthesia care. The term "anesthesia
time" includes, if counted by the anesthesia practitioner,
blocks of time around an interruption in anesthesia time
provided the anesthesia practitioner is furnishing
continuous anesthesia care within the time periods around
the interruption;

SCS SB 841 70
(2) "Anesthesia time units", time units recognized
with appropriate time intervals that do not exceed fifteen
minutes in length for each interval and that, taken
together, represent the total anesthesia time for a
particular anesthesia service;
(3) "Excepted benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.998;
(4) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350. The term "health benefit
plan" shall also include MO HealthNet, the children's health
insurance program authorized under chapter 208, the Missouri
consolidated health care plan established under chapter 103,
and any other state-sponsored health insurance program;
(5) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the
term in section 376.1350. The term "health carrier" shall
also include the MO HealthNet division and any Medicaid
managed care organization as defined in section 208.431;
(6) "Payment of anesthesia services", an amount paid
for anesthesia services:
(a) Determined by using prevailing medical coding and
billing standards in the professional medical billing
community, such as the Current Procedural Terminology code
book published by the American Medical Association, the
Medicare Claims Processing Manual, or guidance from
nationally recognized anesthesia organizations; and
(b) Calculated as the product obtained by multiplying
the following together:
a. The sum of the base units for the appropriate
medical code plus anesthesia time units; and
b. An anesthesia conversion factor that is defined in
the individual contract between the health carrier or health
benefit plan and the anesthesia practitioner or group.

SCS SB 841 71
2. No health carrier or health benefit plan shall
establish, implement, or enforce any policy, practice, or
procedure that imposes a time limit for the payment of
anesthesia services provided during a medical or surgical
procedure.
3. No health carrier or health benefit plan shall
establish, implement, or enforce any policy, practice, or
procedure that restricts or excludes all anesthesia time in
calculating the payment of anesthesia services.
4. Excepted benefit plans shall be subject to the
requirements of this section.
376.1280. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Acute pain", pain that results from disease,
accidental or intentional trauma, or other causes, that a
health care provider reasonably expects to last thirty days
or fewer;
(2) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.1350;
(3) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Health care professional", the same meaning given
to the term in section 376.1350.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, when a licensed health care professional acting
within the scope of his or her license prescribes a
nonopioid medication for the treatment of acute pain to a
patient, it shall be unlawful for a health benefit plan to:
(1) Deny coverage of the nonopioid prescription drug
in favor of an opioid prescription drug;

SCS SB 841 72
(2) Require the patient to try an opioid prescription
drug before providing coverage of the nonopioid prescription
drug; or
(3) Require a higher level of cost-sharing for the
nonopioid prescription drug than for an opioid prescription
drug.
3. This section shall apply to health benefit plans
delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed on or
after January 1, 2027.
579.060. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
sale, distribution, or purchase of over-the-counter
methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly:
(1) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise
provides any number of packages of any drug product
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams to the
same individual within a thirty-day period, unless the
amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(2) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within
a thirty-day period any number of packages of any drug
product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers in a
total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams,
without regard to the number of transactions, unless the
amount is purchased, received, or acquired pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(3) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within
a twenty-four-hour period any number of packages of any drug

SCS SB 841 73
product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers in a
total amount greater than three and six-tenths grams,
without regard to the number of transactions, unless the
amount is purchased, received, or acquired pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(4) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise
provides any number of packages of any drug product
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and two-
tenths grams to the same individual within a twelve-month
period, unless the amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed
pursuant to a valid prescription; or
(5) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within
a twelve-month period any number of packages of any drug
product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers in a
total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and two-
tenths grams, without regard to the number of transactions,
unless the amount is purchased, received, or acquired
pursuant to a valid prescription; or
(6) Dispenses or offers drug products that are not
excluded from Schedule V in subsection 17 or 18 of section
195.017 and that contain detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, without
ensuring that such products are located behind a pharmacy
counter where the public is not permitted and that such

SCS SB 841 74
products are dispensed by a registered pharmacist or
pharmacy technician under subsection 11 of section 195.017;
or
(7) Holds a retail sales license issued under chapter
144 and knowingly sells or dispenses packages that do not
conform to the packaging requirements of section 195.418.
2. A pharmacist, intern pharmacist, or registered
pharmacy technician commits the offense of unlawful sale,
distribution, or purchase of over-the-counter
methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly:
(1) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise
provides any number of packages of any drug product
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
total amount greater than three and six-tenth grams to the
same individual within a twenty-four hour period, unless the
amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(2) Fails to submit information under subsection 13 of
section 195.017 and subsection 6 of section 195.417 about
the sales of any compound, mixture, or preparation of
products containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in
accordance with transmission methods and frequency
established by the department of health and senior services;
or
(3) Fails to implement and maintain an electronic log,
as required by subsection 12 of section 195.017, of each
transaction involving any detectable quantity of
pseudoephedrine, its salts, isomers, or salts of optical

SCS SB 841 75
isomers or ephedrine, its salts, optical isomers, or salts
of optical isomers; or
(4) Sells, distributes, dispenses or otherwise
provides to an individual under eighteen years of age
without a valid prescription any number of packages of any
drug product containing any detectable quantity of
pseudoephedrine, its salts, isomers, or salts of optical
isomers, or ephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or
salts of optical isomers.
3. Any person who violates the packaging requirements
of section 195.418 and is considered the general owner or
operator of the outlet where ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
100 phenylpropanolamine products are available for sale shall
101 not be penalized if he or she documents that an employee
102 training program was in place to provide the employee who
103 made the unlawful retail sale with information on the state
104 and federal regulations regarding ephedrine,
105 pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine.
106 4. A manufacturer commits the offense of unlawful
107 sale, distribution, or purchase of over-the-counter
108 methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly fails
109 to pay the fees required under subsection 7 of section
110 195.417.
111 5. The offense of unlawful sale, distribution, or
112 purchase of over-the-counter methamphetamine precursor drugs
113 is a class A misdemeanor.
✓